District of Columbia statutes.
35-102

Disposition of Property — Where impractical to give notice or delay sale; sale authorized by court order.

Upon the application of such carrier, verified by affidavit, to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, setting forth that the place of residence of the owner or consignee of any such freight, baggage, or other property is unknown, or that such freight, baggage, or other property is of such perishable nature, or so damaged, or showing any other cause that shall render it impracticable to give the notice or delay the sale for the period provided in § 35-101, then it shall be lawful for such Court to make an order authorizing the sale of such freight, baggage, or other property upon such terms as to notice as the nature of the case may admit of and to such Court shall seem meet.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1289, ch. 854, § 643
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 534, ch. 1329
Feb. 17, 1909, 35 Stat. 623, ch. 134
Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1310, ch. 125, § 1
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 575, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 157(j)
1973 Ed., § 44-102.
1981 Ed., § 44-102.
This section is referenced in § 35-103.